test/src/morphology/sjd-tests_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - кӯлль: # I
    кӯлль+N+Sg+Nom: кӯлль
    кӯлль+N+Sg+Acc: кӯль
    кӯлль+N+Sg+Gen: кӯль
    кӯлль+N+Sg+Ill: куэлла
    кӯлль+N+Sg+Loc: кӯлесьт
    кӯлль+N+Sg+Com: кӯленѣ
    кӯлль+N+Ess: кӯлленѣ
    кӯлль+N+Par: кӯлле
    кӯлль+N+Sg+Abe: кӯльха
    кӯлль+N+Pl+Nom: кӯль
    кӯлль+N+Pl+Acc: кӯлетѣ
    кӯлль+N+Pl+Gen: [кӯле, кӯлетѣ]
    кӯлль+N+Pl+Ill: кӯлетѣ
    кӯлль+N+Pl+Loc: кӯленѣ
    кӯлль+N+Pl+Com: кӯлегуэйм
    кӯлль+N+Pl+Abe: кӯлеха

  Noun - ме̄рр: 
    ме̄рр+N+Sg+Nom: ме̄рр
    ме̄рр+N+Sg+Acc: ме̄р
    ме̄рр+N+Sg+Gen: ме̄р
    ме̄рр+N+Sg+Ill: ме̄рре
    ме̄рр+N+Sg+Loc: ме̄рэсьт
    ме̄рр+N+Sg+Com: ме̄рэнѣ
    ме̄рр+N+Ess: ме̄ррэнѣ
    ме̄рр+N+Par: ме̄ррэ
    ме̄рр+N+Sg+Abe: ме̄рха
    ме̄рр+N+Pl+Nom: ме̄р
    ме̄рр+N+Pl+Acc: ме̄рэтѣ
    ме̄рр+N+Pl+Gen: [ме̄рэ, ме̄рэтѣ]
    ме̄рр+N+Pl+Ill: ме̄рэтѣ
    ме̄рр+N+Pl+Loc: ме̄рэнѣ
    ме̄рр+N+Pl+Com: ме̄рэгуэйм
    ме̄рр+N+Pl+Abe: ме̄рэха

  Noun - кӯсс: 
    кӯсс+N+Sg+Nom: кӯсс
    кӯсс+N+Sg+Acc: кӯз
    кӯсс+N+Sg+Gen: кӯз
    кӯсс+N+Sg+Ill: кӯссе
    кӯсс+N+Sg+Loc: кӯзэсьт
    кӯсс+N+Sg+Com: кӯзэнѣ
    кӯсс+N+Ess: кӯссэнѣ
    кӯсс+N+Par: кӯссэ
    кӯсс+N+Sg+Abe: кӯзха
    кӯсс+N+Pl+Nom: кӯз
    кӯсс+N+Pl+Acc: кӯзэтѣ
    кӯсс+N+Pl+Gen: [кӯзэ, кӯзэтѣ]
    кӯсс+N+Pl+Ill: кӯзэтѣ
    кӯсс+N+Pl+Loc: кӯзэнѣ
    кӯсс+N+Pl+Com: кӯзэгуэйм
    кӯсс+N+Pl+Abe: кӯзэха

  Noun - на̄ххьпь: 
    на̄ххьпь+N+Sg+Nom: на̄ххьпь
    на̄ххьпь+N+Sg+Acc: на̄пь
    на̄ххьпь+N+Sg+Gen: на̄пь
    на̄ххьпь+N+Sg+Ill: на̄ххпа
    на̄ххьпь+N+Sg+Loc: на̄песьт
    на̄ххьпь+N+Sg+Com: ноа̄пенѣ
    на̄ххьпь+N+Ess: на̄ххьпенѣ
    на̄ххьпь+N+Par: на̄ххьпе
    на̄ххьпь+N+Sg+Abe: на̄пьха
    на̄ххьпь+N+Pl+Nom: ноа̄пь
    на̄ххьпь+N+Pl+Acc: ноа̄петѣ
    на̄ххьпь+N+Pl+Gen: [ноа̄пе, ноа̄петѣ]
    на̄ххьпь+N+Pl+Ill: ноа̄петѣ
    на̄ххьпь+N+Pl+Loc: ноа̄пенѣ
    на̄ххьпь+N+Pl+Com: ноа̄пегуэйм
    на̄ххьпь+N+Pl+Abe: ноа̄пеха
 



#  Noun - шэ̄ӈӈ: 
#    sollâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    sollâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    sollâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    sollâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    sollâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    sollâ+N+Ess: 
#    sollâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
#
#
#  Noun - шэ̄ӈӈ: 
#    sollâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    sollâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    sollâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    sollâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    sollâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    sollâ+N+Ess: 
#    sollâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
#    
#
#  Noun - ыйй: 
#    kielâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    kielâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    kielâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    kielâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    kielâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    kielâ+N+Ess: 
#    kielâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - ылл: 
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    vuoli+N+Sg+Com: 
#    vuoli+N+Ess: 
#    vuoli+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - мӯрр: 
#    šaalu+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    šaalu+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    šaalu+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    šaalu+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    šaalu+N+Sg+Com: 
#    šaalu+N+Ess: 
#    šaalu+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - пя̄йвнэгк: 
#    tullâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    tullâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    tullâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    tullâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    tullâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    tullâ+N+Ess: 
#    tullâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - кӯсс: 
#    tuppâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    tuppâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    tuppâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    tuppâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    tuppâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    tuppâ+N+Ess: 
#    tuppâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - чувв: 
#    luččâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    luččâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    luččâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    luččâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    luččâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    luččâ+N+Ess: 
#    luččâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - ыгкь: 
#    ruttâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    ruttâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    ruttâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    ruttâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    ruttâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    ruttâ+N+Ess: 
#    ruttâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - ка̄ррь: 
#    hattâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    hattâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    hattâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    hattâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    hattâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    hattâ+N+Ess: 
#    hattâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - кēджь: 
#    kietâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    kietâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    kietâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    kietâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    kietâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    kietâ+N+Ess: 
#    kietâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - кӣдт: 
#    paavuotâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    paavuotâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    paavuotâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    paavuotâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    paavuotâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    paavuotâ+N+Ess: 
#    paavuotâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - кӯссь: 
#    kussâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    kussâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    kussâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    kussâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    kussâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    kussâ+N+Ess: 
#    kussâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - пысс: 
#    kuosâ+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    kuosâ+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    kuosâ+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    kuosâ+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    kuosâ+N+Sg+Com: 
#    kuosâ+N+Ess: 
#    kuosâ+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - па̄лл: 
#    pino+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    pino+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    pino+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    pino+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    pino+N+Sg+Com: 
#    pino+N+Ess: 
#    pino+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - а̄шшь: 
#    ritá+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    ritá+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    ritá+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    ritá+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    ritá+N+Sg+Com: 
#    ritá+N+Ess: 
#    ritá+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - пуаз: 
#    ito+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    ito+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    ito+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    ito+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    ito+N+Sg+Com: 
#    ito+N+Ess: 
#    ito+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - цыза: 
#    lasa+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    lasa+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    lasa+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    lasa+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    lasa+N+Sg+Com: 
#    lasa+N+Ess: 
#    lasa+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - оаб: 
#    vašo+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    vašo+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    vašo+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    vašo+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    vašo+N+Sg+Com: 
#    vašo+N+Ess: 
#    vašo+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - оа̄з: 
#    spaha+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    spaha+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    spaha+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    spaha+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    spaha+N+Sg+Com: 
#    spaha+N+Ess: 
#    spaha+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - оаккшэ: 
#    stihá+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    stihá+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    stihá+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    stihá+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    stihá+N+Sg+Com: 
#    stihá+N+Ess: 
#    stihá+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - ылльтэ: 
#    taho+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    taho+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    taho+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    taho+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    taho+N+Sg+Com: 
#    taho+N+Ess: 
#    taho+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - кнӣга: 
#    kámppá+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    kámppá+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    kámppá+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    kámppá+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    kámppá+N+Sg+Com: 
#    kámppá+N+Ess: 
#    kámppá+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - чӣгар: 
#    juŋkká+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    juŋkká+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    juŋkká+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    juŋkká+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    juŋkká+N+Sg+Com: 
#    juŋkká+N+Ess: 
#    juŋkká+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - коавас: 
#    teltta+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    teltta+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    teltta+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    teltta+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    teltta+N+Sg+Com: 
#    teltta+N+Ess: 
#    teltta+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - ва̄нѣтэсь: 
#    asto+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    asto+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    asto+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    asto+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    asto+N+Sg+Com: 
#    asto+N+Ess: 
#    asto+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - вэнс: 
#    čuhčá+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    čuhčá+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    čuhčá+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    čuhčá+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    čuhčá+N+Sg+Com: 
#    čuhčá+N+Ess: 
#    čuhčá+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - нызан: 
#    sivlá+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    sivlá+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    sivlá+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    sivlá+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    sivlá+N+Sg+Com: 
#    sivlá+N+Ess: 
#    sivlá+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - карънэль: 
#    cijkko+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    cijkko+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    cijkko+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    cijkko+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    cijkko+N+Sg+Com: 
#    cijkko+N+Ess: 
#    cijkko+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - ке̄ресь: 
#    njamma+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    njamma+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    njamma+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    njamma+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    njamma+N+Sg+Com: 
#    njamma+N+Ess: 
#    njamma+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - чӯййкэй: 
#    hellá+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    hellá+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    hellá+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    hellá+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    hellá+N+Sg+Com: 
#    hellá+N+Ess: 
#    hellá+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - куаррэй: 
#    pirrá+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    pirrá+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    pirrá+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    pirrá+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    pirrá+N+Sg+Com: 
#    pirrá+N+Ess: 
#    pirrá+N+Pl+Abe: 
# 
#  Noun - кэ̄рхаллей: 
#    millo+N+Sg+Nom: 
#    millo+N+Sg+Gen: 
#    millo+N+Sg+Ill: 
#    millo+N+Sg+Loc: 
#    millo+N+Sg+Com: 
#    millo+N+Ess: 
#    millo+N+Pl+Abe: 
